Washington statutes.
RCW 4.84.080

Schedule of attorneys' fees.

When allowed to either party, costs to be called the attorney fee, shall be as follows:

(1) In all actions where judgment is rendered, two hundred dollars.

(2) In all actions where judgment is rendered in the supreme court or the court of appeals, after argument, two hundred dollars.

[ 2004 c 123 s 1; 1985 c 240 s 1; 1981 c 331 s 3; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 30 s 2; Code 1881 s 512; 1877 p 108 s 516; 1869 p 124 s 464; 1854 p 202 s 374; RRS s 481.]

NOTES:

Court Congestion Reduction Act of 1981—Purpose—Severability—1981 c 331: See notes following RCW 2.32.070.

Costs: RCW 4.84.190.

Transmission of record on change of venue—Costs, attorney's fees: RCW 4.12.090.